District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-205.01

Duties of the Mayor, Council, and Federal Office of Management and Budget.

Repealed.

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 812, Pub. L. 93-198, title V, § 501
Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 777, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11601(a)(1)

History